Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2026 Act  is added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Cervical cancer screening”  means health care services or products provided to
an individual without apparent symptoms of an illness, injury or disease, as recommended
by the United States Preventive Services Task Force as  grade A or B or as recommended
by the Health Resources and  Services Administration’s guidelines, for the purpose of de-
tecting the presence of cervical cancer or precancerous lesions.
(B) “Cervical cancer screening” does  not include services that occur primarily for the
treatment of diagnosed cervical cancer.
(b)(A) “Follow-up examination” means  any necessary diagnostic testing required after
an abnormal cervical cancer screening result to fully evaluate for potential malignancy.
(B) “Follow-up examination” does  not include services that occur primarily for the
treatment of diagnosed cervical cancer.
(2) A carrier offering a group health benefit plan or an individual health  benefit plan in
this state that  reimburses the cost of cervical cancer screenings may not impose deductibles,
coinsurance, copayments or other  out-of-pocket costs on the coverage of medically neces-
sary:
(a) Cervical cancer screenings; and
(b) Follow-up examinations,  regardless of whether different samples from the prior
cervical cancer screening are used or the follow-up examination  is performed on a different
date than the cervical cancer screening. Follow-up examinations include colposcopy, biopsy
and additional cytology or human papillomavirus tests.
(3) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 743B.005 is amended to read:
743B.005. For purposes of ORS 743.004, 743.007, 743.022, 743.416, 743.417, 743.535,  743A.101,
743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.109, 743B.128, 743B.250 and 743B.323  and section 2 of this 2026 Act :
(1) “Actuarial certification” means a written statement by a member of the  American Academy
of Actuaries or  other individual acceptable to the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services that a carrier is in compliance with the provisions  of ORS 743B.012 based upon
the person’s examination, including a review of the appropriate records and of the actuarial as-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 1
sumptions and methods used by the carrier in establishing premium rates  for small employer health
benefit plans.
(2) “Affiliate” of, or person “affiliated” with, a specified  person means any carrier who, directly
or indirectly through one  or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by or is under common
control with a specified person. For  purposes of this definition, “control” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 732.548.
(3) “Affiliation period”  means, under the terms of a group health benefit plan issued by a health
care service contractor, a period:
(a) That is applied uniformly and without  regard to any health status related factors to an
enrollee or late enrollee;
(b) That must expire  before any coverage becomes effective under the plan for the enrollee or
late enrollee;
(c) During which no premium shall be charged to the enrollee or late enrollee; and
(d) That begins on the enrollee’s or late enrollee’s first date  of eligibility for coverage and runs
concurrently with any eligibility waiting period under the plan.
(4) “Bona fide association” means an association that:
(a) Has been in active existence for at least five years;
(b) Has been formed and maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining insurance;
(c) Does not  condition membership in the association on any factor relating to the health status
of an individual or the individual’s dependent or employee;
(d) Makes health insurance coverage that is offered through the association available  to all
members of the association regardless of the health status of the member  or individuals who are
eligible for coverage through the member;
(e) Does not make health  insurance coverage that is offered through the association available
other than in connection with a member of the association;
(f) Has a constitution and bylaws; and
(g) Is not owned or controlled by a carrier, producer or affiliate of a carrier or producer.
(5) “Carrier” means any person who provides health benefit plans in this state, including:
(a) A licensed insurance company;
(b) A health care service contractor;
(c) A health maintenance organization;
(d) An association or group of employers that provides benefits by means of a multiple  employer
welfare arrangement and that:
(A) Is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341; or
(B) Is fully insured and otherwise exempt under ORS 750.303 (4) but elects to  be governed by
ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013; or
(e) Any other person or corporation responsible for the payment of benefits or provision of ser-
vices.
(6) “Dependent” means the  spouse or child of an eligible employee, subject to applicable terms
of the health benefit plan covering the employee.
(7) “Eligible employee”  means an employee who is eligible for coverage under a group health
benefit plan.
(8) “Employee” means any individual employed by an employer.
(9) “Enrollee” means an employee, dependent of the  employee or an individual otherwise eligible
for a group or individual health benefit plan  who has enrolled for coverage under the terms of the
plan.
(10) “Exchange” means the health insurance exchange as defined in ORS 741.300.
(11) “Exclusion period” means a period during which specified treatments or services  are ex-
cluded from coverage.
(12) “Financial impairment” means that a carrier is not insolvent and is:
(a) Considered by the director to be potentially unable to fulfill its contractual obligations; or
(b) Placed under  an order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 2
(13)(a) “Geographic average rate” means the arithmetical average of the lowest premium and the
corresponding highest premium to be  charged by a carrier in a geographic area established by the
director for the carrier’s:
(A) Group health benefit plans offered to small employers; or
(B) Individual health benefit plans.
(b) “Geographic  average rate” does not include premium differences that are due to differences
in benefit design, age, tobacco use or family composition.
(14) “Grandfathered health plan” has the meaning prescribed by  rule by the United States Sec-
retaries of Labor, Health and Human Services and the Treasury  pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 18011(e) that
is in effect on January 1, 2017.
(15) “Group eligibility waiting period” means, with respect to a  group health benefit plan, the
period of employment  or membership with the group that a prospective enrollee must complete be-
fore plan coverage begins.
(16)(a) “Health benefit plan” means any:
(A) Hospital expense, medical expense or hospital or medical expense policy or certificate;
(B) Subscriber contract of a health care service contractor as defined in ORS 750.005; or
(C) Plan provided by  a multiple employer welfare arrangement or by another benefit arrange-
ment defined in the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as  amended, to the
extent that the plan is subject to state regulation.
(b) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(A) Coverage for accident only, specific disease or condition only, credit or disability income;
(B) Coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(C) Medicare supplement insurance policies;
(D) Coverage of TRICARE services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(E) Benefits delivered through  a flexible spending arrangement established pursuant to section
125 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, when the  benefits are provided in addition
to a group health benefit plan;
(F) Separately offered long term care insurance, including, but not limited to, coverage of nurs-
ing home care, home health care and community-based care;
(G) Independent, noncoordinated,  hospital-only indemnity insurance or other fixed indemnity in-
surance;
(H) Short term health insurance policies;
(I) Dental only coverage;
(J) Vision only coverage;
(K) Stop-loss coverage that meets the requirements of ORS 742.065;
(L) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;
(M) Insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law;
(N) Automobile medical payment insurance or insurance under which benefits are  payable with
or without regard to fault and that is  statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance
policy or equivalent self-insurance; or
(O) Any employee welfare benefit plan that is exempt from  state regulation because of the fed-
eral Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
(17) “Individual health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan:
(a) That is issued to an individual policyholder; or
(b) That provides individual coverage  through a trust, association or similar group, regardless
of the situs of the policy or contract.
(18) “Initial enrollment period”  means a period of at least 30 days following commencement of
the first eligibility period for an individual.
(19) “Late enrollee” means an individual who enrolls in a group health  benefit plan subsequent
to the initial enrollment period during  which the individual was eligible for coverage but declined
to enroll. However, an eligible individual shall not be considered a late enrollee if:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 3
(a) The individual qualifies for a special enrollment period in accordance with 42 U.S.C.  300gg
or as prescribed by rule by the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(b) The individual applies for coverage during an open enrollment period;
(c) A court issues an order that  coverage be provided for a spouse or minor child under an
employee’s employer sponsored health benefit plan  and request for enrollment is made within 30
days after issuance of the court order;
(d) The individual is employed by an  employer that offers multiple health benefit plans and the
individual elects a different health benefit plan during an open enrollment period; or
(e) The individual’s  coverage under Medicaid, Medicare, TRICARE, Indian Health Service or a
publicly sponsored or subsidized health plan, including, but not  limited to, the medical assistance
program under ORS chapter 414, has been involuntarily terminated  within 63 days after applying for
coverage in a group health benefit plan.
(20) “Multiple employer welfare arrangement” means a multiple employer welfare  arrangement
as defined in section 3 of the  federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended,
29 U.S.C. 1002, that is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341.
(21) “Preexisting condition exclusion” means a limitation or exclusion of benefits or a denial of
coverage based on a medical condition being  present before the effective date of coverage or before
the date coverage is denied, whether or not any medical advice, diagnosis, care  or treatment was
recommended or received for the condition before the date of coverage or denial of coverage.
(22) “Premium” includes insurance premiums or other fees charged for a  health benefit plan,
including the costs of benefits paid or reimbursements made to or  on behalf of enrollees covered by
the plan.
(23) “Rating period” means the 12-month calendar period for which premium rates established
by a carrier are in effect, as determined by the carrier.
(24) “Representative” does not  include an insurance producer or an employee or authorized
representative of an insurance producer or carrier.
(25)(a) “Short term health insurance policy” means a policy of  health insurance that is in effect
for a period of three months or less, including the term of a renewal of the policy.
(b) As used in this subsection, “term of a renewal” includes the term of a  new short term health
insurance policy issued by an insurer to a policyholder no later than  60 days after the expiration
of a short term health insurance policy issued by the insurer to the policyholder.
(26) “Small employer” means an employer  who employed an average of at least one but not more
than 50 full-time equivalent employees on business days during  the preceding calendar year and who
employs at least  one full-time equivalent employee on the first day of the plan year, determined in
accordance with a methodology prescribed by the Department of Consumer and Business  Services
by rule.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 243.144 is amended to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply  with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.114[ .]; and
(12) Section 2 of this 2026 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 4
SECTION 5.  ORS 243.144, as operative until June 30, 2026, is amended to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services  and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325;
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c); [ and]
(12) ORS 743A.114[ .]; and
(13) Section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 243.877 is amended to read:
243.877. Benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services  and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.114[ .]; and
(12) Section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 243.877, as operative until June 30, 2026, is amended to read:
243.877. Benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services  and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325;
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c); [ and]
(12) ORS 743A.114[ .]; and
(13) Section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 8.
Section 2 of this 2026 Act applies to policies or certificates of insurance is-
sued, renewed or extended on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 5
SECTION 9. The amendments to ORS 243.144 and 243.877 by  sections 4 to 7 of this 2026
Act apply to health  benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the
Oregon Educators Benefit Board that are issued, renewed or extended on or after the effec-
tive date of this 2026 Act, and to self-insured health  benefit plans in effect for periods be-
ginning on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
Passed by Senate February 10, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1527 (SB 1527-A) Page 6